Utah statutes.
59-7-601.   Credit of interest income from state and federal securities.

(1)  There shall be allowed as a credit against the tax an amount equal to 1% of the gross interest income included in state taxable income from:

(a)  bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued by the state and its agencies and instrumentalities, and bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of any political subdivision as described in Section 11-14-303; and

(b)  stocks, notes, or obligations issued by, or guaranteed by the United States Government, or any of its agencies and instrumentalities as defined under federal law.

(2)  Amounts otherwise qualifying for the credit, but not allowable because the credit exceeds the tax, may be carried back three years or may be carried forward five years as a credit against the tax.  Such carryover credits shall be applied against the tax before the application of the credits earned in the current year and on a first-earned first-used basis.

